Hawaii, session 2026, SB536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 342J, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§342J-    Testing laboratory; diseases; quality of air, water, soil, and biological specimens.  (a) The department shall: (1)  Establish and operate a laboratory capable of: (A)  Testing for diseases; (B)  Testing for the presence of toxins in samples of air, water, soil, and biological and other specimens; and (C)  Conducting other high complexity testing; and (2)  Ensure that the laboratory complies with all applicable standards enumerated in the Clinical Laboratories Improvement Amendments of 1988, title 42 United States Code section 263a. (b)  The laboratory established pursuant to subsection (a) shall receive and analyze samples submitted by any person who reasonably believes that the sample contains environmental toxins in violation of applicable law. (c)  In operating the laboratory, the department shall ensure prompt and full public access to the results of analyses of all submissions of testing samples submitted to the laboratory.  The department shall provide complete reports of all submissions no later than ten days after receipt of the submissions." SECTION 2. The department of health may obtain and expend federal funds for the construction and operation of the testing laboratory established pursuant to this Act.  However, if the department of health is unable to obtain firm commitment from the federal government for the adequate financing of the laboratory within nine months of the effective date of this Act, the department of health shall proceed expeditiously to construct and begin initial operations of the laboratory using the funds appropriated by this Act. SECTION 3. The department of health shall submit a report on its progress of establishing a laboratory pursuant to this Act, to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 4. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of financing the construction of an environmental toxins testing laboratory. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________